Missouri, session 2026, HB2386.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.630, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 478.630, to read as follows:
478.630. 1. There shall be two circuit judges in the twentieth judicial circuit
consisting of the counties of Franklin, Gasconade and Osage. These judges shall sit in
divisions numbered one and two.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982.
3. There shall be one additional associate circuit judge in the twentieth judicial
circuit. This associate circuit judge shall not be included in the statutory formula for
authorizing additional associate circuit judges per county as provided under section
478.320. The governor shall appoint such judge, and that judge shall serve until
January 1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2028.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.